incubator/apertium-pl-sk/apertium-pl-sk.pl.dix
    <pardef n="noc__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ą</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ami</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ach</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="miłoś/ć__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ć</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ć</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cią</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ciom</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ciami</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ciach</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="w/ieś__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ieś</l>
          <r>ieś<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>si</l>
          <r>ieś<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>si</l>
          <r>ieś<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ieś</l>
          <r>ieś<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sią</l>
          <r>ieś<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>si</l>
          <r>ieś<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>si</l>
          <r>ieś<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sie</l>
          <r>ieś<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>si</l>
          <r>ieś<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>siom</l>
          <r>ieś<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sie</l>
          <r>ieś<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>siami</l>
          <r>ieś<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>siach</l>
          <r>ieś<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sie</l>
          <r>ieś<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dło/ń__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ń</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ń</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nią</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nie</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>niom</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nie</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ńmi</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>niach</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nie</l>
          <r>ń<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="noc"><i>noc</i><par n="noc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wieś"><i>w</i><par n="w/ieś__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dłoń"><i>dło</i><par n="dło/ń__n"/></e>
    <e lm="adaptabilność"><i>adaptabilnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="adresowalność"><i>adresowalnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="agresywność"><i>agresywnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="akceptowalność"><i>akceptowalnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aktualność"><i>aktualnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="akuratność"><i>akuratnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alkaliczność"><i>alkalicznoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alternatywność"><i>alternatywnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="amoralność"><i>amoralnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anachroniczność"><i>anachronicznoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anarchiczność"><i>anarchicznoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="apatyczność"><i>apatycznoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="apolityczność"><i>apolitycznoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="asertywność"><i>asertywnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="atrakcyjność"><i>atrakcyjnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="autonomiczność"><i>autonomicznoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bezbożność"><i>bezbożnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="beznadziejność"><i>beznadziejnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bezradność"><i>bezradnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bipolarność"><i>bipolarnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brutalność"><i>brutalnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ceremonialność"><i>ceremonialnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chromość"><i>chromoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cywilność"><i>cywilnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="czerwoność"><i>czerwonoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="czleneność"><i>czlenenoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="czynność"><i>czynnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dekoratywność"><i>dekoratywnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="długowieczność"><i>długowiecznoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dostępność"><i>dostępnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="drobność"><i>drobnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dwudzielność"><i>dwudzielnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dwuznaczność"><i>dwuznacznoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dysharmoniczność"><i>dysharmonicznoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="egocentryczność"><i>egocentrycznoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ekskluzywność"><i>ekskluzywnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ekspresywność"><i>ekspresywnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ekstremalność"><i>ekstremalnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="elementarność"><i>elementarnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eteryczność"><i>eterycznoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="familiarność"><i>familiarnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fazowość"><i>fazowoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fotogeniczność"><i>fotogenicznoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="funkcyjność"><i>funkcyjnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="globalność"><i>globalnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gotowość"><i>gotowoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="heroiczność"><i>heroicznoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="homogeniczność"><i>homogenicznoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="indukcyjność"><i>indukcyjnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="inteligentność"><i>inteligentnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kompetentność"><i>kompetentnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kontrowersyjność"><i>kontrowersyjnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="krętość"><i>krętoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lekkomyślność"><i>lekkomyślnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lubość"><i>luboś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mierność"><i>miernoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mnogość"><i>mnogoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="niedbałość"><i>niedbałoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nieprzyjemność"><i>nieprzyjemnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ostrość"><i>ostroś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="solidność"><i>solidnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="starość"><i>staroś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="studenckość"><i>studenckoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="swojskość"><i>swojskoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zabawność"><i>zabawnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zgubność"><i>zgubnoś</i><par n="miłoś/ć__n"/></e>
